Arkansas, session 2025, SB631.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-93-307 is amended to read as follows:
16-93-307. Probation generally — Revocation hearings.
(a)(1) A defendant arrested for violation of suspension or probation
is entitled to a preliminary hearing to determine whether there is reasonable
cause to believe that he or she has violated a condition of suspension or
probation.
(2) The Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section,
the preliminary hearing shall be conducted by a court having original
jurisdiction to try a criminal matter as soon as practicable after arrest and
reasonably near the place of the alleged violation or arrest.
(3) The defendant shall be given prior notice of the:
(A) Time and place of the preliminary hearing;
(B) Purpose of the preliminary hearing; and
(C) Condition of suspension or probation the defendant is
alleged to have violated.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the
*MBM227*
04/04/2025 4:54:47 PM MBM227

SB631
defendant has the right to hear and controvert evidence against him or her
and to offer evidence in his or her own behalf.
(5)(A) If the court conducting the preliminary hearing finds
that there is reasonable cause to believe that the defendant has violated a
condition of suspension or probation, it may order the defendant to be
detained or it may return the defendant to supervision and may consider
imposing one (1) or more intermediate sanctions in the sanctioning grid
pending further revocation proceedings before the court that originally
suspended imposition of sentence on the defendant or placed him or her on
probation.
(B)(i) If the court conducting the preliminary hearing
does not find reasonable cause, it shall order the defendant released from
custody.
(ii) However, a release under subdivision
(a)(5)(B)(i) of this section does not bar the court that suspended imposition
of sentence on the defendant or placed him or her on probation from holding a
hearing on the alleged violation of suspension or probation or from ordering
that the defendant appear before it.
(6) The court conducting the preliminary hearing shall prepare
and furnish to the court that suspended imposition of sentence on the
defendant or placed him or her on probation a summary of the preliminary
hearing, including the responses of the defendant and the substance of the
documents and evidence given in support of revocation.
(b)(1) A suspension or probation shall not be revoked except after a
revocation hearing.
(2) The Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section,
the revocation hearing shall be conducted by the court that suspended
imposition of sentence on the defendant or placed him or her on probation
within a reasonable period of time after the defendant's arrest, not to
exceed sixty (60) days.
(3) The defendant shall be given prior written notice of the:
(A) Time and place of the revocation hearing;
(B) Purpose of the revocation hearing; and
(C) Condition of suspension or probation the defendant is
alleged to have violated.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the
04/04/2025 4:54:47 PM MBM227

SB631
defendant has the right to:
(A) Hear and controvert evidence against him or her;
(B) Offer evidence in his or her own defense; and
(C) Be represented by counsel.
(5) If suspension or probation is revoked, the court shall
prepare and furnish to the defendant a written statement of the evidence
relied on and the reasons for revoking suspension or probation.
(c) At a preliminary hearing pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section or a revocation hearing pursuant to subsection (b) of this section:
(1) The defendant has the right to counsel and to confront and
cross-examine an adverse witness unless the court specifically finds good
cause for not allowing confrontation; and
(2) The court may permit the introduction of any relevant
evidence of the alleged violation, including a letter, affidavit, and other
documentary evidence, regardless of its admissibility under the rules
governing the admission of evidence in a criminal trial.
(d) A preliminary hearing pursuant to subsection (a) of this section
is not required if:
(1) The defendant waives the preliminary hearing;
(2) The revocation is based on the defendant's commission of an
offense for which he or she has been tried and found guilty in an independent
criminal proceeding; or
(3) The revocation hearing pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section is held promptly after the arrest and in the judicial district where
the alleged violation occurred or where the defendant was arrested.
(e) If a defendant on probation or a suspended imposition of sentence
is subsequently arrested and charged with a felony that constitutes a felony
involving violence under § 5-4-501(d)(2) and the felony offense is filed in a
county or judicial district other than the county or judicial district where
the defendant is on probation or suspended imposition of sentence, the
proceedings under this section may be brought in the county where the
defendant was arrested and charged with a felony that constitutes a felony
involving violence under § 5-4-501(d)(2) if the court which placed the
defendant on probation or suspended imposition of sentence files a written
consent agreeing to the proceedings under this section being brought in the
county where the defendant was arrested and charged with a felony that
04/04/2025 4:54:47 PM MBM227

SB631
constitutes a felony involving violence under § 5-4-501(d)(2).



































04/04/2025 4:54:47 PM MBM227